Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.135

Order or decree for child support—Compliance with RCW 26.23.050.

Every court order or decree establishing a child support obligation shall be entered in compliance with the provisions of RCW 26.23.050.

[ 1987 c 435 s 16; 1986 c 138 s 1; 1984 c 260 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1987 c 435: See RCW 26.23.900.